New York, session 2025-2026, S1210.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 804-e 2 to read as follows: 3 § 804-e. History of the labor movement curriculum or instruction. 1. 4 The commissioner, in consultation with any appropriate agency, shall 5 establish and/or revise the curriculum or instruction for school 6 districts in the history of both organized and unorganized labor in the 7 United States, expanding any current curriculum or instruction to 8 include a more complete picture of labor history and information on what 9 the labor movement looks like currently. The content of such curriculum 10 or instruction shall be age appropriate and shall be developed according 11 to the needs and abilities of pupils at successive grade levels in order 12 to provide information and understanding of the history of both organ- 13 ized and unorganized labor in the United States. 14 2. Schools may include the above materials as a component of their 15 social studies curriculum or any other way the school deems appropriate. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026 and shall apply to school 17 years commencing on or after such date. Effective immediately, the addi- 18 tion, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for 19 the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized to 20 be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03934-01-5